Utah statutes.
58-57-12.   Independent practice prohibited.
A respiratory care practitioner may not:
(1)  practice independently of a practitioner or of a health care facility
while under the supervision of a practitioner; or
(2)  charge a fee for his services independently of a practitioner or health
care facility.
